Maryland, session 2026, HB1111.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb1111*

HOUSE BILL 1111
2–205.
(a) There is a Class 3 winery license.
(b) A license holder may:
(1) establish and operate a plant for fermenting and bottling wine at the
location described in the license;
(2) import bulk wine from the holder of a nonresident dealer’s permit;
(3) ACQUIRE BULK WINE FROM THE HOLDER OF A CLASS 4 LIMITED
WINERY LICENSE;
(4) sell and deliver wine to:
(i) a holder of a wholesaler’s license;
(ii) a holder of a permit that is authorized to acquire wine; and
(iii) a person outside the State that is authorized to acquire wine;
[(4)] (5) subject to subsection (c) of this section, sell at retail wine made
at the plant from products grown in the State to an individual participating in a guided
tour of the plant; and
[(5)] (6) serve, at no charge, not more than 6 ounces of wine made at the
plant to an individual who has attained the legal drinking age and is participating in a
guided tour of the plant.
(c) An individual may purchase wine under subsection [(b)(4)] (B)(5) of this
section if the individual has attained the legal drinking age.
(d) The license holder shall report to the Executive Director annually on a form
provided by the Executive Director on:
(1) the amount of alcoholic beverages produced under the license;
(2) the amount of alcoholic beverages sold for off–premises consumption;
and
(3) the amount of alcoholic beverages served for on–premises consumption.
(e) Except as otherwise provided by law, the license holder may not sell alcoholic
beverages for off–premises consumption to a person who intends to resell the alcoholic
beverages.

HOUSE BILL 1111 3
(f) The annual license fee:
(1) shall be determined by the Executive Director; and
(2) may not exceed $750.
2–206.
(b) There is a Class 4 limited winery license.
(c) (1) A license holder may:
(i) subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, from available
Maryland agricultural products:
1. ferment and bottle wine; and
2. distill and bottle pomace brandy; [and]
(ii) sell and deliver the wine and pomace brandy to:
1. a holder of a wholesaler’s license;
2. a holder of a permit that is authorized to acquire wine or
pomace brandy; or
3. a person outside the State that is authorized to acquire
wine or pomace brandy; AND
(III) SELL AND DELIVER BULK WINE TO THE HOLDER OF A CLASS
3 WINERY LICENSE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.